Massachusetts, session 194th, S2569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 31. (a) The department shall develop a comprehensive statewide plan for the
environmentally responsible management of end-of-life solar photovoltaic panels and energy
storage system batteries, including but not limited to lithium-ion batteries.
(b) The department shall develop the comprehensive statewide plan in consultation with
the department of energy resources and the Massachusetts clean energy technology center
established in section 2 of chapter 23J, and in collaboration with a stakeholder group with
representatives from the solar industry, local governments, the solid waste industry,
environmentalists, recyclers and other interested parties. The plan shall be updated every 10
years, or more frequently, as determined by the commissioner.
(c) In developing the comprehensive statewide plan, the department shall consider: (i)
potential environmental hazards, including but not limited to fires; (ii) potential reuse,
refurbishment, recycling, disposal, and demolition; (iii) the current and projected volume of solar
of 2

panels and batteries used in the commonwealth, including but not limited to anticipated life
cycles; (iv) anticipated infrastructure needs, including but not limited to transportation of
materials; (v) emerging technologies; (vi) potential scaled manufacturer or installer stewardship
programs; (vii) anticipated costs to implement the plan; (viii) statutory recommendations, if any;
and (ix) other matters pertaining to solar panel and battery decommissioning and stewardship, in
the department’s discretion.
(d) Not later than December 1, 2026, the department shall submit the plan to the chairs of
the joint committee on environment and natural resources and the clerks of the house and senate.
(e) The department shall post the plan and any subsequent revisions on its website.
of 2